District of Columbia statutes.
34-611

Commission to furnish certified copies of orders.

Upon application of any person the Commission shall furnish certified copies, under the seal of the Commission, of any order made by it, which shall be prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 990, ch. 150, § 8, par. 71

History

1981 Ed., § 43-912.
1973 Ed., § 43-713.

Prior Codifications